Utah statutes.
76-6-1203.   Mortgage fraud.

A person commits the offense of mortgage fraud if the person does any of the following with the intent to defraud:

(1)  knowingly makes any material misstatement, misrepresentation, or omission during the mortgage lending process, intending that it be relied upon by a mortgage lender, borrower, or any other party to the mortgage lending process;

(2)  knowingly uses or facilitates the use of any material misstatement, misrepresentation, or omission, during the mortgage lending process, intending that it be relied upon by a mortgage lender, borrower, or any other party to the mortgage lending process;

(3)  files or causes to be filed with any county recorder in Utah any document that the person knows contains a material misstatement, misrepresentation, or omission; or

(4)  receives any proceeds or any compensation in connection with a mortgage loan that the person knows resulted from a violation of this section.



Enacted by Chapter 370, 2008 General Session

